Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6144.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2g. (1) Subject to subsection (2), each year, if the general appropriations bills for the succeeding fiscal year are not enacted into law before October 1, the state treasurer may loan, without interest, surplus funds to a school district or intermediate school district if both of the following conditions are met: (a) The loan amount does not exceed the amount that the school district or intermediate school district received from the school aid fund for the same month from the immediately preceding year. (b) The loan is for a period not to exceed 1 year. (2) Subsection (1) applies until the general appropriations bills for the succeeding fiscal year are enacted into law. (3) In addition to the conditions provided in subsection (1), the state treasurer may prescribe additional terms of a loan issued under this section. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Intermediate school district" means that term as defined in section 4 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.4. (b) "School district" means that term as defined in section 6 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.6.